Oklahoma, session 2025, SB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1314, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1314. A. When a bail bondsman or managing general
agent accepts collateral, the bail bondsman or managing general
agent shall give a written receipt for same, and this receipt shall
give in detail a full description of the collateral received. A
description of the collateral shall be listed on the undertaking by
affidavit. All property taken as collateral, whether personal,
intangible or real, shall be receipted for and deemed, for all
purposes, to be in the name of, and for the use and benefit of, the
insurer. Every receipt, encumbrance, mortgage or other evidence of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB378 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the custody, possession or claim shall facially indicate that it has
been taken or made on behalf of the insurer through its authorized
agent, the individual licensed bondsman or managing general agent
who has transacted the undertaking with the bond principal. Any
mortgage or other encumbrance against real property taken under the
provisions of this section which does not indicate beneficial
ownership of the claim to be in favor of the insurer shall be deemed
to constitute a cloud on the title to real estate and shall subject
the person filing, or causing same to be filed, in the real estate
records of the county, to a penalty of treble damages or One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever is greater, in an action
brought by the person, organization or corporation injured thereby.
For collateral taken, or liens or encumbrances taken or made
pursuant to the provisions of this section, the individual bondsman
or managing general agent taking possession of the property or
making the lien, claim or encumbrance shall do so on behalf of the
insurer, and the individual licensed bondsman shall be deemed to act
in the capacity of fiduciary in relation to both:
1. The principal or other person from whom the property is
taken or claimed against; and
2. The insurer whose agent is the licensed bondsman.
As fiduciary and bailee for hire, the individual bondsman shall
be liable in criminal or civil actions at law for failure to
properly receipt or account for, maintain or safeguard, release or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB378 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

deli ver possession upon lawful demand, in addition to any other
penalties set forth in this subsection. No person who takes
possession of property as collateral pursuant to this section shall
use or otherwise dissipate the asset, or do otherwise with the
property than to safeguard and maintain its condition pending its
return to its lawful owner, or deliver to the insurer, upon lawful
demand pursuant to the terms of the bailment.
When collateral security is received in the form of cash or
check or other negotiable instrument, the bondsman shall deposit the
cash or instrument within two (2) business days after receipt in an
established, separate non-interest-bearing trust account in any bank
located in Oklahoma. The trust account funds required under this
section shall not be commingled with other operating funds.
B. Every licensed bondsman shall file, monthly and
electronically, with the Insurance Commissioner and on forms
approved by the Commissioner as follows:
1. A monthly report showing every bond written, amount of bond,
whether released or revoked during each month, showing the court and
county, and the style and number of the case, premiums charged and
collateral received; and
2. Monthly reports showing total current liabilities, all bonds
written during the month by the professional bondsman or multicounty
agent bondsman and by any licensed bondsman who may countersign for
the professional bondsman or multicounty agent bondsman, all bonds
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB378 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

term inated during the month, and the total liability and a list of
all bondsmen currently employed by the professional bondsman or
multicounty agent bondsman.
Monthly reports shall be submitted electronically to the
Insurance Commissioner by the fifteenth day of each month. The
records shall be maintained by the Commissioner as public records.
C. Every licensee shall keep at the place of business of the
licensee the usual and customary records pertaining to transactions
authorized by the license. All of the records shall be available
and open to the inspection of the Commissioner at any time during
business hours during the three (3) years immediately following the
date the liability of the bondsman on the bond is discharged by the
court or the date collateral is returned by the bondsman to its
lawful owner, whichever is later. If an appearance bond is never
executed and filed with the court, then all records shall be
maintained for three (3) years immediately following the date the
documents were prepared. The Commissioner may require a financial
examination or market conduct survey during any investigation of a
licensee.
D. Each bail bondsman shall submit each month with the monthly
report of the bondsman, a reviewal fee equal to two-tenths of one
percent (2/10 of 1%) fifteen ten-thousandths of one percent (.0015%)
of the new liability written for that month. The fee shall be

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB378 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

paya ble to the Insurance Commissioner who shall deposit same with
the State Treasurer.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 6, 2025 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB378 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)